Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.120

Conclusions of appraisers—Order for production and exchange between parties.

After the commencement of a condemnation action, upon motion of either the condemnor or condemnee, the court may order, upon such terms and conditions as are fair and equitable the production and exchange of the written conclusions of all the appraisers of the parties as to just compensation owed to the condemnee, as prepared for the purpose of the condemnation action, and the comparable sales, if any, used by such appraisers. The court shall enter such order only after assurance that there will be mutual, reciprocal and contemporaneous disclosures of similar information between the parties.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 236 s 8.]